Idaho, session 2026, H0562.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 41-1842, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
41-1842. COMMERCIAL INSURANCE -- CANCELLATION -- NONRENEWAL. (1) Ap-
plicability. The provisions of this section apply only to:
(a) Commercial property insurance policies;
(b) Commercial liability insurance policies other than aviation and
employer's liability insurance policies;
(c) Commercial multiperil insurance policies.
The provisions of this section do not apply to: block cancellations or
block nonrenewals as provided in section 41-1841, Idaho Code, reinsurance,
excess and surplus lines insurance, residual market risks, worker's compen-
sation insurance, multistate location risks, policies subject to retrospec-
tive rating plans, excess or umbrella policies and such other policies that
are exempted by the director of the department of insurance.
(2) Definitions. For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Cancellation" means termination of a policy at a date other than
its expiration date.
(b) "Expiration date" means the date upon which coverage under a policy
ends. It also means, for a policy written for a term longer than one (1)
year or with no fixed expiration date, each annual anniversary date of
such policy.
(c) "Nonpayment of premium" means the failure or inability of the named
insured to discharge any obligation in connection with the payment of
premiums on a policy of insurance subject to this section, whether such
payments are payable directly to the insurer or its agent or indirectly
payable under a premium finance plan or extension of credit.
(d) "Nonrenewal" or "not to renew" means termination of a policy at its
expiration date.
(e) "Renewal" or "to renew" means the issuance, or the offer so to is-
sue, by an insurer of a policy succeeding a policy previously issued and
delivered by the same insurer or an insurer within the same group of in-
surers, or the issuance of a certificate or notice extending the term of
an existing policy for a specified period beyond its expiration date.
(3) Notice of cancellation.
(a) Permissible cancellations. If coverage under a policy has not been
in effect for sixty (60) days and the policy is not a renewal, cancella-


tion of such policy shall be effected by mailing or delivering a written
notice to the first-named insured at the last known mailing address
shown on the policy at least thirty (30) days before the effective date
of the cancellation, provided however, if such cancellation is for the
reason stated in subsection (3)(a)(i) of this section, the time such
cancellation may be effective following notice shall be as provided in
subsection (3)(b)(i) of this section. A cancellation requested by the
insured shall be effective on the later of the date requested by the in-
sured or the date it is received by the insurer. After coverage has been
in effect for more than sixty (60) days or after the effective date of a
renewal policy, whichever is earlier, no insurer shall cancel a policy
unless the cancellation is based on at least one (1) of the following
reasons:
(i) Nonpayment of premium.
(ii) Fraud or material misrepresentation made by or with the
knowledge of the named insured in obtaining the policy, continuing
the policy, or in presenting a claim under the policy.
(iii) Activities or omissions on the part of the named insured
which increase any hazard insured against, including a failure to
comply with loss control recommendations.
(iv) Change in the risk which materially increases the risk of
loss after insurance coverage has been issued or renewed includ-
ing, but not limited to, an increase in exposure to regulation,
legislation or court decision.
(v) Loss or decrease of the insurer's reinsurance covering all or
part of the risk or exposure by the policy.
(vi) Determination by the director that the continuation of the
policy would jeopardize an insurer's solvency or would place the
insurer in violation of the insurance laws of this state or any
other state.
(vii) Violation or breach by the insured of any policy terms or
conditions other than nonpayment of premium.
(b) Notification of cancellation.
(i) A notice of cancellation of insurance coverage by an in-
surer shall be in writing and shall be mailed or delivered to the
first-named insured at the last known mailing address as shown
on the policy. Notices of cancellation based on subsections
(3)(a)(ii) through (a)(vii) of this section shall be mailed or
delivered at least thirty (30) sixty (60) days prior to the ef-
fective date of the cancellation. Notices of cancellation for
the reason stated in subsection (3)(a)(i) of this section without
regard to when such cancellation shall be effected shall be mailed
or delivered at least ten (10) days prior to the effective date of
cancellation. If delivered via United States mail, the ten (10)
day notification period shall begin to run five (5) days following
the date of postmark. The notice shall state the effective date of
the cancellation.
(ii) The insurer shall provide the first-named insured with a
written statement setting forth the reason(s) for the cancella-
tion if: (1) the insured requests such a statement in writing;


and (2) the named insured agrees in writing to hold the insurer
harmless from liability for any communication giving notice of
or specifying the reasons for a cancellation or for any statement
made in connection with an attempt to discover or verify the ex-
istence of conditions which would be a reason for a cancellation
under this section.
(4) Notice of nonrenewal.
(a) An insurer may decline to renew a policy if the insurer delivers or
mails to the first-named insured, at the last known mailing address,
written notice that the insurer will not renew the policy. Such no-
tice shall be mailed or delivered at least forty-five (45) sixty (60)
days before the expiration date. If the notice is mailed less than
forty-five (45) sixty (60) days before expiration, coverage shall re-
main in effect until forty-five (45) sixty (60) days after notice is
mailed or delivered. Earned premium for any period of coverage that
extends beyond the expiration date shall be considered pro rata based
upon the previous year's rate. For purposes of this section, the trans-
fer of a policyholder between companies within the same insurance group
is not a nonrenewal or a refusal to renew. In addition, changes in de-
ductibles, changes in premium, and changes in the amount of insurance or
reductions in policy limits or coverage shall not be deemed to be nonre-
newals or refusals to renew. Notice of nonrenewal is not required if:
(i) The insurer or a company within the same insurance group has
offered to issue a renewal policy; or
(ii) Where the named insured has obtained replacement coverage or
has agreed in writing to obtain replacement coverage.
(b) If an insurer provides the notice described in subsection (4) of
this section and thereafter the insurer extends the policy for ninety
(90) days or less, an additional notice of nonrenewal is not required
with respect to the extension.
(5) Notice of premium or coverage changes. An insurer shall mail or de-
liver to the named insured, at the last known mailing address, written no-
tice of a total premium increase greater than ten percent (10%) which is the
result of a comparable increase in premium rates, changes in deductibles,
reductions in limits, or reductions in coverages at least thirty (30) days
prior to the expiration date of the policy. If the insurer fails to provide
such thirty (30) day notice, the coverage provided to the named insured shall
remain in effect until thirty (30) days after such notice is given or until
the effective date of replacement coverage obtained by the named insured,
whichever first occurs. For the purposes of this section, notice is consid-
ered given thirty (30) days following date of mailing or delivery of the no-
tice to the named insured. If the insured elects not to renew, any earned
premium for the period of extension of the terminated policy shall be calcu-
lated pro rata at the lower of the current or previous year's rate. If the
insured accepts the renewal, the premium increase, if any, and other changes
shall be effective on and after the first day of the renewal term.
(6) Proof of notice. Proof of mailing of notice of cancellation, or
of nonrenewal or of premium or coverage changes, to the named insured at the
last known mailing address showing on the policy, shall be sufficient proof
of notice.


(7) Application, effective date and termination. The provisions of
this section shall apply only to policies with coverage effective dates af-
ter the effective date of this section.
(8) Rules. The director may promulgate rules to implement the pro-
visions of this section. Every rule promulgated within the authority
conferred by this act shall be of temporary effect and shall become permanent
only by enactment by statute at the regular session of the legislature first
following adoption of the rule. Rules not approved in the above manner shall
be rejected, null, void and of no force and effect on July 1, following sub-
mission of the rules to the legislature.
SECTION 2. That Section 41-2401, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
41-2401. STANDARD FIRE POLICY. (1) No fire insurer shall issue any
fire insurance policy covering on property or interest therein in this
state, other than on the form known as the New York standard as revised in
1943, except as follows:
(a) An insurer may print on or in its policy its name, location, date
of incorporation, plan of operation, whether stock, mutual, reciprocal
or organized under special charter provisions, and if mutual or recip-
rocal whether on cash premium or assessment plan; and if it be a stock
company, the amount of its paid up capital stock, the names of its offi-
cers and agents, the number and date of the policy, and, if it is issued
by an agent, the words, "this policy shall not be valid until counter-
signed by the duly authorized agent of the company at ...."; and, if a
mutual or reciprocal insurer, the policy must state the contingent lia-
bility, if any, of its policyholders, members, or subscribers for pay-
ment of losses and expenses not provided for by its cash funds.
(b) An insurer may print or use in its policies printed forms of de-
scription and specifications of the property insured.
(c) An insurer insuring against damage by lightning may print in the
clause enumerating the perils insured against the additional words,
"also any damage by lightning whether fire ensues or not," and in the
clause providing for an apportionment of loss in case of other insurance
the words, "whether by fire, lightning or both."
(d) A domestic insurer may print in its policies any provisions which it
is authorized or required by the law to insert therein, and any foreign
insurer may, with the approval of the director, so print any provision
required by its charter or deed of settlement, or by the laws of its own
state or country, not contrary to the laws of this state; but the direc-
tor shall require any provision which, in his opinion modifies the con-
tract of insurance in such a way as to affect the question of loss, to
be appended to the policy by an endorsement or rider as hereinafter pro-
vided.
(e) The blanks in the standard form may be completed in print or in writ-
ing.
(f) An insurer may print upon policies issued in compliance with the
preceding provisions of this section the words, "Idaho standard pol-
icy."


(g) An insurer may write upon the margin or across the face of the pol-
icy, or write or print in type not smaller than nonpareil upon a slip,
slips, rider or riders to be attached thereto, provisions adding to or
relating to those contained in the standard form; and all such slips,
riders, endorsements and provisions must be signed by the officers or
agents of the insurer so using them.
(h) If the policy be made by a mutual, reciprocal or other insurer hav-
ing special regulations lawfully applicable to its organization, mem-
bership, policies or contracts of insurance such regulations shall ap-
ply to and form a part of the policy as the same may be written or printed
upon, attached or appended thereto.
(i) Every policy shall have legibly inscribed upon its face and filing
back suitable words to designate whether the insurer making such insur-
ance be a stock, mutual or reciprocal insurer, provided, that any in-
surer organized under special charter provisions may so indicate upon
its policy and may add a statement of the plan under which it operates in
this state.
(j) Every fire policy shall contain language that provides for a thirty
(30) sixty (60) day written notice to the insured prior to cancellation
of the policy, accompanied by the reason for the cancellation, provided
however, that where cancellation is for the nonpayment of premium, at
least ten (10) days' notice of such cancellation, accompanied by the
reason for the cancellation, shall be given. If delivered via United
States mail, such ten (10) day notification period shall begin to run
five (5) days following the date of postmark. Proof of mailing of no-
tice of cancellation, or of intention not to renew, or of reasons for
cancellation or nonrenewal to the named insured at his address shall be
sufficient proof of notice.
(k) Every fire policy shall contain language that provides for a sixty
(60) day written notice to the insured prior to nonrenewal of the policy
accompanied by the reason for the nonrenewal. If the notice is mailed
less than sixty (60) days before expiration, coverage shall remain in
effect until sixty (60) days after notice is mailed or delivered. Proof
of mailing of notice of intention not to renew to the named insured at
his address shall be sufficient proof of notice.
(k) (l) Every fire policy shall provide that it becomes effective at
12:01 a.m. of the standard time of the place where the property covered
by the insurance is located, on the effective date of the policy.
(2) An insurer issuing the standard fire policy is authorized to affix
thereto or include therein a written statement that the policy does not cover
loss or damage caused by nuclear reaction, nuclear radiation or radioactive
contamination, all whether directly or indirectly resulting from an insured
peril under the policy; but nothing herein contained shall be construed to
prohibit the attachment to any such policy of an endorsement or endorsements
specifically assuming coverage for loss or damage caused by nuclear reac-
tion, nuclear radiation or radioactive contamination.
(3) The standard fire policy is not mandatory for vehicle insurance, or
for marine insurance, or inland marine insurance as the same is defined pur-
suant to section 41-1401(2), Idaho Code, or for insurance on growing crops.


(4) Any policy or contract otherwise subject to the provisions of sub-
section (1) hereof, which includes either on an unspecified basis as to the
coverage or for a single premium coverage against the peril of fire and sub-
stantial coverage against other perils need not comply with the provisions
of subsection (1) hereof, provided:
(a) Such policy or contract shall afford coverage, with respect to the
peril of fire, not less than the coverage afforded by such standard fire
policy,
(b) The provisions in relation to mortgagee interests and obligations
in such standard fire policy shall be incorporated therein without
change,
(c) Such policy or contract is complete as to all of its terms with-
out reference to the standard form of fire insurance policy or any other
policy, and
(d) The director is satisfied that such policy or contract complies
with the provisions hereof.
(5) With respect to a commercial insurance policy, such standard fire
insurance policy may exclude coverage for loss by fire or other perils in-
sured against if the fire or other perils are caused directly or indirectly
by terrorism. As used in this section, the term "terrorism" means a violent
act or an act that:
(a) Is dangerous to human life, property or infrastructure;
(b) Results in damage within the United States, or outside of the United
States in the case of an air carrier or vessel or the premises of a United
States mission; and
(c) Is committed by an individual or individuals, as part of an effort
to coerce the civilian population of the United States or to influence
the policy or affect the conduct of the United States government by co-
ercion.
SECTION 3. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after Jan-
uary 1, 2027.